Louisiana, session 2026, SB285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.38(C)(1)(e) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2740.38. Shreveport; downtown development district
* * *
C.(1) The Shreveport Downtown Development District, hereinafter referred
to as the "district," shall be governed by the Shreveport Downtown Development
Authority hereinafter referred to as the "authority," originally established by
Ordinance No. 47 of 1975 of the city council of the city of Shreveport. The members
of the Shreveport Downtown Development Authority shall be composed of two
nonvoting members: the mayor of the city of Shreveport and the executive director
of the Shreveport Downtown Development Authority and seven voting members
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-31 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 285
who shall be appointed by the mayor of the city of Shreveport (the "mayor"), subject
to confirmation by the city council as follows:
* * *
(e) One member from a list of three nominees submitted to the mayor by the
state senators whose senatorial districts are defined by R.S. 24:35.1(A)(37)(38) as
District 37 38 and by R.S. 24:35.1(A)(39) as District 39 and by the state
representative whose representative district is defined by R.S. 24:35.5(A)(4) as
District 4.
* * *